New York, session 2025-2026, A10222.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 2 of the workers' compensation law 2 is amended by adding a new closing paragraph to read as follows: 3 For the purposes of this chapter, the employer of a delivery network 4 company worker, as defined in subdivision four of this section, shall be 5 a delivery network company. "Delivery network company" shall mean a 6 person, corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other entity 7 that is operating in New York state exclusively using a digital network 8 to connect delivery network company customers with delivery network 9 company workers who provide delivery for orders of products made via a 10 digital network. "Delivery network company" shall not include (i) a 11 transportation network company, as defined by section sixteen hundred 12 ninety-one of the vehicle and traffic law; or (ii) a restaurant, or 13 restaurant chain, that enables customers to place orders for food using 14 a digital network that was created specifically for use by customers of 15 such restaurant or restaurant chain. 16 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 2 of the workers' compensation law is 17 amended by adding a new closing paragraph to read as follows: 18 "Employee" shall also mean, for the purposes of this chapter, a deliv- 19 ery network company worker, which shall mean an individual who has 20 entered into an agreement with a delivery network company, as defined in 21 subdivision three of this section, to pick up and deliver delivery 22 network company orders for compensation. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14086-01-5